Hawaii statutes.
§261-11 Public purpose of activities.
The acquisition of any lands or interests therein pursuant to this chapter, the
planning, acquisition, establishment, construction, improvement, maintenance,
equipment, and operation of airports and air navigation facilities; and the
exercise of any other powers granted by this chapter to the department of
transportation are declared to be public and governmental functions, exercised
for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity. All lands and other
property and privileges acquired and used by or on behalf of the State in the
manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter shall and are declared
to be acquired and used for public and governmental purposes and as a matter of
public necessity. [L 1947, c 32, pt of §1; RL 1955, §15-17; am L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §26; HRS §261-11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next